Illinois, session 104th, HB3228.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 3-819 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-819)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-819)7    Sec. 3-819. Trailer; tax. 8    (a) Farm Trailer. Any farm trailer drawn by a motor 9vehicle of the second division registered under paragraph (a) 10or (c) of Section 3-815 and used exclusively by the owner for 11his own agricultural, horticultural or livestock raising 12operations and not used for hire, or any farm trailer utilized 13only in the transportation for-hire of seasonal, fresh, 14perishable fruit or vegetables from farm to the point of first 15processing, and any trailer used with a farm tractor that is 16not an implement of husbandry may be registered under this 17paragraph in lieu of registration under paragraph (b) of this 18Section upon the filing of a proper application and the 19payment of the $10 registration fee and the highway use tax 20herein for use of the public highways of this State, at the 21following rates which include the $10 registration fee: 22SCHEDULE OF FEES AND TAXES23Gross Weight in Lbs.ClassTotal Amount  HB3228- 2 -LRB104 11017 LNS 21099 b1Including Vehicleeach2and Maximum LoadFiscal Year310,000 lbs. or lessVDD $160410,001 to 14,000 lbs.VDE206514,001 to 20,000 lbs.VDG266620,001 to 28,000 lbs.VDJ478728,001 to 36,000 lbs.VDL7508    An owner may only apply for and receive 2 farm trailer 9registrations.10    (b) All other owners of trailers, other than apportionable 11trailers registered under Section 3-402.1 of this Code, used 12with a motor vehicle on the public highways, shall pay to the 13Secretary of State for each registration year a flat weight 14tax, for the use of the public highways of this State, at the 15following rates (which includes the registration fee of $10 16required by Section 3-813): 17SCHEDULE OF TRAILER FLAT 18WEIGHT TAX REQUIRED 19BY LAW20Gross Weight in Lbs.Total Fees21Including Vehicle andeach22Maximum LoadClassFiscal Year232,000 lbs. and less UT$36 243,000 lbs. and lessTA$36255,000 lbs. and more than 3,000TB154268,000 lbs. and more than 5,000TC158  HB3228- 3 -LRB104 11017 LNS 21099 b110,000 lbs. and more than 8,000TD206214,000 lbs. and more than 10,000TE270320,000 lbs. and more than 14,000TG358432,000 lbs. and more than 20,000TK822536,000 lbs. and more than 32,000TL1,182640,000 lbs. and more than 36,000TN1,6027    Of the fees collected under this subsection, other than 8the fee collected for a Class UT or TA trailer, $1 of the fees 9shall be deposited into the Secretary of State Special 10Services Fund and $99 of the fees shall be deposited into the 11Road Fund.12    (c) The number of axles necessary to carry the maximum 13load provided shall be determined from Chapter 15 of this 14Code.15(Source: P.A. 101-32, eff. 6-28-19; 102-353, eff. 1-1-22.)